Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-109 Supplies, convention blanks.
The commissioner shall purchase at the expense of this State and in the manner
provided by law:

(1) Printing, books, reports, furniture, equipment,
and supplies as the commissioner deems necessary to the proper discharge of the
commissioner's duties under this code.

(2) Convention form insurers' annual statement
blanks, which the commissioner may purchase from any printer manufacturing the
forms for the various states. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next